Hawaii statutes.
§134-52 Switchblade knives; prohibitions;
penalty. (a) Whoever knowingly manufactures, sells, transfers, possesses,
or transports in the State any switchblade knife, being any knife having a
blade which opens automatically (1) by hand pressure applied to a button or
other device in the handle of the knife, or (2) by operation of inertia,
gravity, or both, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Whoever knowingly possesses or
intentionally uses or threatens to use a switchblade knife while engaged in the
commission of a crime shall be guilty of a class C felony. [L 1959, c 225, §1;
Supp, §264-9; HRS §769-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 195, §4]

Case Notes

A butterfly knife is
not a switchblade knife. 73 H. 89, 828 P.2d 272.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next